Hawaii, session 2026, GM1307.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. Section 235-110.8, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (b) to read as follows:
"(b) Each taxpayer subject to the tax imposed by this
chapter, who has filed a net income tax return for a taxable
year may claim a low-income housing tax credit against the
-taxpayer's net income tax liability. The amount of the credit
shall be deductible from the taxpayer's net income tax
liability, if any, imposed by this chapter for the taxable year
in which the credit is properly claimed on a timely basis. A
credit under this section may be allocated by a partnership or
limited liability company in any manner agreed to by the
partners or members regardless of whether the individual or
entity to receive the credit is deemed to be a partner or member
for federal income tax purposes, so long as the individual or
entity is deemed to be a partner or member pursuant to
applicable state law.
2026-3356 HB1920 GDI HMSO

Page 2 1920
H.B. NO.
H.D. 1
S.D. 2
C.D. 1
For tax credits issued after July 1^ 2026, a partner or
member that is a partnership or limited liability company that
has been allocated a credit may either further allocate the
credit or transfer, sell, or assign all or a portion of the
credit to any taxpayer, whether or not the taxpayer owns a
direct or indirect interest in the qualified low-income
building; provided that for any tax year in which the credit is
transferred, sold, or assigned pursuant to this subsection, the
transferor shall notify the department of taxation of the
transfer, sale, or assignment by the twentieth day of the first
month following the end of the taxable year for which the credit
may be claimed in a manner prescribed by the department;
provided further that the transferee shall not further allocate,
transfer, sell, or assign all or a portion of the credit to any
taxpayer.
The credit may be claimed whether or not the taxpayer is
eligible to be allocated a federal low-income housing tax credit
pursuant to section 42 of the Internal Revenue Code."
SECTION 2. Act 129, Session Laws of Hawaii 2016, as
amended by Act 226, Session Laws of Hawaii 2021, section 2, is
amended by amending section 4 to read as follows:
2026-3356 HB1920 CDl HMSO

Page 3
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
"SECTION 4. This Act, upon its approval, shall take effect
on January 1, 2017, and shall apply to qualified low-income
buildings awarded credits after December 31, 2016; provided that
this Act shall be repealed on December 31, [2^^^] 2032, and
section 235-110.8, Hawaii Revised Statutes, shall be reenacted
in the form in which it read on the day prior to the effective
date of this Act."
SECTION 3. Act 226, Session Laws of Hawaii 2021, is
amended by amending section 4 to read as follows:
"SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2021,
and shall apply to taxable years beginning after December 31,
2020; provided that the amendments made to section 235-110.8,
Hawaii Revised Statutes, by section 1 of this Act shall not be
repealed when that section is reenacted on December 31, [2-027, ]
2032, pursuant to section 4 of Act 129, Session Laws of Hawaii
2016, [and] as amended by section 2 of this Act."
SECTION 4. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 5. This Act shall take effect upon its approval;
provided that the amendments made to section 235-110.8(b),
Hawaii Revised Statutes, by section 1 of this Act shall not be
2026-3356 HB1920 CDl HMSO 3

Page 4 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
repealed when that section is reenacted on December 31, 2032,
pursuant to section 4 of Act 129, Session Laws of Hawaii 2016,
as amended by section 2 of Act 226, Session Laws of Hawaii 2021,
and as amended by section 2 of this Act.
i 20 i 2 i 6 i -3 i 3 i 5 i 6 n HB1 i 9 i 20 i i C n Dl i HM i S i O i 4

H.B. NO 1920
H.D. 1
S.D. 2
C.D. 1
APPROVED this Sth day of July , 2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 1920, HD 1, SD 2, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date; May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B. No. 1920, H.D. 1, S.D. 2, C.D. I
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAPI
Date: May 1,2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
Clerk of the Senate
30-26